Tennessee statutes. Title 38 Prevention And Detection Of Crime
Chapter 3

Public Officers Preventing Commission of Offenses

38-3-101. Methods of preventing offenses.

Public offenses may be prevented by the intervention of the officers of justice by:

Requiring security to keep the peace; and

Suppressing riots, unlawful assemblies and breaches of the peace.

Code 1858, § 4931; Shan., § 6892; Code 1932, § 11416; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 38-201.

Cross-References. Registration of persons acting as law enforcement officers, § 8-8-221.

38-3-102. Duties of sheriff.

The sheriff is the principal conservator of the peace in the sheriff's county. It is the sheriff's duty to suppress all affrays, riots, routs, unlawful assemblies, insurrections, or other breaches of the peace, to do which the sheriff may summon to such sheriff's aid as many of the inhabitants of the county as such sheriff thinks proper.

It shall be the duty of the sheriffs, in their respective counties, by themselves or deputies, to patrol the roads of the county, to ferret out crimes, to secure evidence of crimes, and to apprehend and arrest criminals.

Code 1858, § 4933; Shan., § 6894; Code 1932, § 11418; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 38-202; Acts 2005, ch. 142, § 2.

Cross-References. Conservator of peace, § 8-8-213.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 28.119.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, § 28.

Law Reviews.

Local Government Law (Clyde L. Ball), 6 Vand. L. Rev. 1206 (1953).

Attorney General Opinions. Requirement of local governments to provide police, fire, and medical services. OAG 10-03, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 3 (1/19/10).

Sheriff's disregard of chancery court order. OAG 10-120, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 126 (12/30/10).

38-3-103. Other conservators of the peace.

The judicial and ministerial officers of justice in the state, and the mayor, aldermen, marshals and police of cities and towns, and the director, commissioner, or similar head of any metropolitan or municipal police department, whether elected or appointed, are also conservators of the peace, and are required to aid in the prevention and suppression of public offenses, and for this purpose may act with all the power of the sheriff.

Code 1858, § 4934; Shan., § 6895; Code 1932, § 11419; Acts 1968, ch. 434, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 38-203.

Cross-References. Enforcement of laws by municipal officers, § 6-54-401.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, § 28.

Attorney General Opinions. Requirement of local governments to provide police, fire, and medical services. OAG 10-03, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 3 (1/19/10).

38-3-104. Officers may command aid.

All officers authorized to execute judicial process, who find, or have reason to apprehend, that resistance will be made to the execution of judicial process, may command the aid of the inhabitants as prescribed in § 38-3-102 for suppressing riots.

Code 1858, § 4935; Shan., § 6896; Code 1932, § 11420.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Employer's Wrongful Discharge and the Union's Breach of the Duty of Fair Representation — Does Tennessee Need a Statute of Limitations? (Marsha H. Ashlock), 20 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 15 (1984).

38-3-105. Acts by persons aiding officers.

Whenever the officers of justice are authorized to act in the prevention of public offenses, other persons who, by command of the officers of justice, act in aid of the officers of justice, are justified in so doing.

Code 1858, § 4932; Shan., § 6893; Code 1932, § 11417; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 38-205.

38-3-106. Refusal to obey command to aid officers.

Any person commanded to aid, under this chapter, any magistrate or officer, who without good cause refuses or neglects to obey such command, commits a Class C misdemeanor.

Code 1858, § 4937; Shan., § 6898; Code 1932, § 11422; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 38-206; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Magistrates and judicial commissioners, title 40, ch. 5.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

38-3-107. Neglect of duty by officer.

Any magistrate or officer, having notice of any unlawful act provided against in this chapter, who neglects or refuses to do the magistrate's or officer's duty in the prevention of the public offense commits a Class C misdemeanor.

Code 1858, § 4938; Shan., § 6899; Code 1932, § 11423; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 38-207; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 22 Tenn. Juris., Sheriffs, § 8.

38-3-108. Duty to arrest.

It is the duty of all peace officers who know, or have reason to suspect, any person of being armed with the intention of committing a riot or affray, or of assaulting, wounding, or killing another person, or of otherwise breaking the peace, to arrest such person immediately, and take such person before the court of general sessions.

Code 1858, § 4939 (deriv. Acts 1825, ch. 19, § 1); Shan., § 6900; Code 1932, § 11424; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 38-208.

38-3-109. Bond to keep the peace.

A person arrested pursuant to § 38-3-108 shall be required to give bond in not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250), nor more than two thousand dollars ($2,000), with good security, to keep the peace; and, on failing or refusing so to give the required bail, the person shall be committed to jail until bail is given, or the person is otherwise discharged according to law.

Code 1858, § 4940 (deriv. Acts 1825, ch. 19, §§ 1, 5); Shan., § 6901; Code 1932, § 11425; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 38-209.

Cross-References. Admission to bail, title 40, ch. 11, part 1.

Destruction of public record of bond upon expiration, § 40-32-101.

Right of bail, Tenn. Const., art. I, § 15.

Collateral References.

What constitutes breach of peace bond. 54 A.L.R. 388.

38-3-110. Form of bond — Scire facias upon forfeiture.

The bonds required to be given by § 38-3-109 shall be made payable to the state, filed in the office of the circuit or criminal court clerk, and, upon forfeiture, the district attorney general shall cause scire facias to issue on the forfeiture, and the amount collected by the sheriff shall be paid to the county trustee for county purposes.

Code 1858, § 4942 (deriv. Acts 1825, ch. 19, § 3); Shan., § 6903; Code 1932, § 11427; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 38-210.

Cross-References. Scire facias, title 29, ch. 32.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 4 Tenn. Juris., Bail and Recognizance, § 17.

38-3-111. Officer failing to perform duties prescribed in §§ 38-3-108, 38-3-109.

Any peace officer who knowingly fails or refuses to perform the duties required by § 38-3-108 or § 38-3-109 commits a Class C misdemeanor.

Code 1858, § 4941 (deriv. Acts 1825, ch. 19, § 6); Shan., § 6902; Code 1932, § 11426; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 38-211; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

38-3-112. Power of governor to order posse or military force from other county.

If it appears to the governor that the power of any county is not sufficient to enable the sheriff to execute process delivered to that sheriff, the governor may, on the application of the sheriff, order a posse or military force as is necessary from any other county or counties.

Code 1858, § 4936; Shan., § 6897; Code 1932, § 11421; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 38-212.

Collateral References.

Power to declare martial law apart from military occupation or operations. 24 A.L.R. 1183.

38-3-113. Federal officers making arrests for nonfederal offenses.

A sworn federal law enforcement officer, who in official capacity is authorized by law to make arrests, shall, when making an arrest in this state for a nonfederal offense, have the same legal status and immunity from suit as a state or local law enforcement officer if the arrest is made under the following circumstances:

The officer reasonably believes that the person arrested has committed a felony in the officer's presence or is committing a felony in the officer's presence;

The officer reasonably believes the person arrested has committed a misdemeanor that amounts to a breach of the peace in the officer's presence or is committing such a misdemeanor in the officer's presence; or

The officer is rendering assistance to a law enforcement officer of this state in an emergency or at the request of the officer.

Acts 1989, ch. 135, § 1.

Cross-References. Arrest, title 40, ch. 7, part 1.

Uniform law on fresh pursuit, title 40, ch. 7, part 2.

38-3-114. Acting as peace officers for the office of homeland security.

The office of homeland security may apply to the commissioner of safety, to commission such number of its officers who directly support state, federal, and local law enforcement activities involved in countering or responding to acts of terrorism, as the office shall designate, to act as peace officers for the office of homeland security.

The commissioner, upon such application, may appoint such person as the office of homeland security designates, or as many people as the governor deems proper to be such peace officers, and shall give commissions to those appointed.

Each such officer, throughout every county in the state, shall have and exercise, for the sole purpose of carrying out the scope of assigned duties as specified or limited within the exclusive judgment of the office of homeland security, all the powers of a peace officer, including the power to make arrests for public offenses anywhere in the state. Further, such officers may serve process in criminal and penal prosecutions for such offenses, and shall have authority to carry weapons for the reasonable purposes of their offices and while in the performance of their assigned duties.

The keepers of jails in any county or municipality where a violation occurs, for which any such arrest is made by an officer of the homeland security office, shall receive all persons arrested by such officers to be dealt with according to law, and persons so arrested shall be received by keepers of jails on the same basis and shall have the same status as prisoners arrested by any other law enforcement officer.

Every officer so appointed shall, when on duty, have in the officer's possession a badge and identification card identifying the officer as an officer of the office of homeland security, and the officer shall exhibit the badge and identification card on demand and before making an arrest within a reasonable time.

When the office of homeland security no longer requires the services of the peace officer so appointed, it shall file a notice to that effect with the commissioner's office. Thereupon, the powers of such peace officer shall cease and terminate.

Homeland security officers appointed under this section must complete appropriate initial training and recurrent law enforcement training substantially equivalent to the requirements of the Tennessee peace officers standards and training commission.

Acts 2004, ch. 593, § 1.

38-3-115. No public funds, personnel or property of state to be allocated to enforce federal laws governing firearms where it would violate state laws.

On or after July 1, 2015, no public funds of this state, or any political subdivision of this state, shall be allocated to the implementation, regulation, or enforcement of any federal law, executive order, rule, or regulation regulating the ownership, use, or possession of firearms, ammunition, or firearm accessories, if the expenditure of public funds would result in the violation of another Tennessee statute, Tennessee common law, or the Constitution of Tennessee.

On or after July 1, 2015, no personnel or property of this state, or any political subdivision of this state, shall be allocated to the implementation, regulation, or enforcement of any federal law, executive order, rule, or regulation regulating the ownership, use, or possession of firearms, ammunition, or firearm accessories, if the use of personnel or property would result in the violation of another Tennessee statute, Tennessee common law, or the Constitution of Tennessee.

On or after July 1, 2016, no personnel or property of this state, or any political subdivision of this state, shall be allocated to the implementation, regulation, or enforcement of any international law or treaty regulating the ownership, use, or possession of firearms, ammunition, or firearm accessories, if the use of personnel or property would result in the violation of another Tennessee statute, Tennessee common law, or the Constitution of Tennessee.

On or after July 1, 2016, no public funds of this state, or any political subdivision of this state, shall be allocated to the implementation, regulation, or enforcement of any international law or treaty regulating the ownership, use, or possession of firearms, ammunition, or firearm accessories, if the expenditure of public funds would result in the violation of another Tennessee statute, Tennessee common law, or the Constitution of Tennessee.

For purposes of this section, “firearm” has the same meaning as defined in § 39-11-106.

Acts 2015, ch. 380, § 1; 2016, ch. 864, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 864, § 1 added subsection (c) to this section. The section was reorganized by authority of the Code Commission so that subsection (c) as added by ch. 864 was redesignated as present (b). Former (a) was redesignated as current (a)(1) and former (b) was redesignated as (a)(2).

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the inviolability of gun rights in this state, please refer to Acts 2016, ch. 864.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment added (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 380, § 2. April 30, 2015.

Acts 2016, ch. 864, § 2. April 19, 2016.

38-3-116. Inquiry regarding arrested person's children and whether they will be left unattended by arrest — Policies and procedures for conducting welfare checks — Liability.

Each law enforcement agency shall ensure that, whenever a person is arrested and taken into custody by an officer of the agency, the person is asked whether that person is the parent or legal custodian of any children that will be left unattended by the person's arrest. From this information, the officer shall determine whether the child or children will be endangered by the parent or legal custodian's absence following an arrest.

Each law enforcement agency shall develop policies and procedures for conducting welfare checks on any child identified under subsection (a) as endangered. A welfare check may be performed by the arresting agency or another agency responsible for ensuring the safety and welfare of children.

In the event the arrested person fails to inform the arresting law enforcement agency of any endangered children described in subsection (a), no arresting law enforcement agency, nor its personnel, shall be liable.

Acts 2018, ch. 801, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 801, § 2. July 1, 2018.

38-3-117. Interaction of law enforcement officer with person who exhibits characteristics of acquired brain injury, intellectual disability, or developmental disability.

Any law enforcement officer who interacts with a person who is a victim, witness, or suspect, or is otherwise stopped by a law enforcement officer in relation to an offense or violation, and who exhibits characteristics of an acquired brain injury, an intellectual disability, or a developmental disability shall make a good faith effort to immediately contact the parent or guardian of a minor, or a person's conservator regarding the interaction.

A law enforcement officer shall, upon the request of a person diagnosed with an acquired brain injury, an intellectual disability, or a developmental disability or the parent or guardian of a minor, or the person's conservator, make a good faith effort to ensure that a psychiatrist, psychologist, mental health counselor, special education instructor, clinical social worker, or related professional is present at all interviews with the person. The professional must have experience treating, teaching, or assisting patients or clients who have been diagnosed with an acquired brain injury, an intellectual disability, or a developmental disability or must be certified in special education with a concentration focused on persons with an acquired brain injury, an intellectual disability, or a developmental disability.

If the person who has an acquired brain injury, an intellectual disability, or a developmental disability, or if the parent or guardian of a minor or the person's conservator, requests the presence of a professional at an interview, except for expenses related to accommodations mandated by state or federal disability law, the person shall initially be responsible for any costs or fees charged by the professional related thereto. If the person is a victim or witness, the defendant shall reimburse the victim or witness for all expenses related to the attendance of the professional at the interview, in addition to other restitution or penalties provided by law, upon conviction related to the offense involving the victim or witness.

Failure to have a professional present at the time of the interview is not a basis for suppression of the statement or the contents of the interview or for a cause of action against the law enforcement officer or agency.

This subsection (b) applies to a person who is the victim, a suspect, or a defendant formally accused of a crime.

Each law enforcement agency shall ensure that appropriate policies are developed that implement this section and that training is provided to law enforcement officers based on such policies.

For purposes of this section:

“Acquired brain injury” means an alteration in brain function or other evidence of brain pathology; and

“Developmental disability” and “intellectual disability” have the same meanings as defined in § 33-1-101.

Acts 2018, ch. 981, § 2.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 981, § 3. July 1, 2019.

38-3-118. Policies and guidelines regarding use of marked law enforcement vehicles by off-duty law enforcement officers for travel to and from vulnerable locations.

Except as provided in subsection (b), a chief law enforcement officer of a state or local law enforcement agency may develop and implement policies and guidelines regarding the use of marked law enforcement vehicles by off-duty law enforcement officers for travel to and from vulnerable locations in order to project an enhanced security presence while at such locations.

A chief law enforcement officer shall not develop or implement policies or guidelines in accordance with subsection (a) without the express approval of:

With respect to a local law enforcement agency, the executive head or legislative body of the local government, as applicable, vested with the authority to direct such chief law enforcement officer; and

With respect to a state law enforcement agency, the executive head of the state department or agency within which the state law enforcement agency is created.

For purposes of this section, “vulnerable locations” includes places of worship, schools, and parks.

Acts 2019, ch. 139, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 139, § 2. April 9, 2019.

38-3-119. [Reserved.]

The Tennessee valley authority (TVA) may apply to the commissioner of safety for the appointment and commissioning of such number of its agents, servants, or employees as TVA shall designate to act as peace officers, as provided in this section. The commissioner, upon the application, shall appoint persons as TVA designates to be peace officers, and shall give commissions to those appointed. Any agent, servant, or employee of TVA so designated shall be eligible for the appointment and commission.

Before entering into the performance of duties, every officer appointed pursuant to subsection (a) shall take and subscribe an oath of office and enter into a surety bond in the sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), payable to the state of Tennessee, conditioned upon the faithful performance of all duties as officer. The oath of office and bond, with a copy of the commission, shall be filed with the secretary of state. In lieu of individual bonds, a duly executed blanket bond covering all TVA peace officers appointed and commissioned pursuant to this section, as principals, with TVA as surety, in the amount of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for each officer and conditioned upon the faithful performance of the officers' duties, may be filed by TVA with the secretary of state, in which event individual bonds shall not be required.

Each officer, throughout every county in the state in which TVA does business, operates, or owns or controls property, including leaseholds and rights-of-way, shall have and exercise, for the sole purpose of carrying out the scope of assigned duties as specified or limited within the exclusive judgment of TVA board of directors, all of the powers of a peace officer, including the power to make arrests for public offenses committed against TVA officials or employees or committed upon, about, or against TVA property or on public roads or rights-of-way passing through or over such property, and, while in pursuit of a person fleeing after committing such an offense, may pursue the person and make arrest anywhere in the state. Further, the officers may provide security at TVA's nuclear facilities, may serve process in criminal and penal prosecutions for such offenses, and shall have authority to carry weapons for the reasonable purposes of the officers' offices and while in the performance of the officers' assigned duties. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the authorities, responsibilities and liabilities of the officers shall be limited as provided for under this section.

The keepers of jails in any county or municipality in which the violation occurs for which any such arrest is made by a TVA peace officer shall receive all persons arrested by such officers to be dealt with according to law, and persons so arrested shall be received by keepers of jails on the same basis and shall have the same status as prisoners arrested by any other law enforcement officer.

Every officer appointed pursuant to subsection (a) shall, when on duty, have in possession a badge or identification card identifying the officer as a TVA peace officer, and the officer shall exhibit the badge or identification card on demand and before making an arrest.

All compensation of TVA peace officers appointed and commissioned pursuant to subsection (a) shall be fixed and paid exclusively by TVA.

When TVA no longer requires the services of a person appointed and commissioned as a TVA peace officer pursuant to this section, TVA shall file a notice to that effect with the commissioner of safety. Thereupon, the powers of the officer shall cease and terminate.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, no cause of action arising out of any act or omission by a TVA peace officer commissioned under this section shall be brought against the state, or any agency, official or employee of the state.

Subsections (a)-(h) shall apply to the owner of a category I nuclear facility and the owner of a category I nuclear facility shall have the same rights, authority and limitations as TVA possesses with regard to the appointment of peace officers pursuant to this section.

Each peace officer appointed or designated by the owner of a category I nuclear facility shall possess all of the powers, in any county where the facility is located, of a peace officer, including the power to make arrests for public offenses committed against employees or agents or against the property of the category I nuclear facility and, while in pursuit of a person fleeing after committing such an offense, may pursue the person and make arrests anywhere in the state. Additionally, the officers shall possess authority to investigate anywhere in the state any such offense and shall possess authority to carry weapons for the reasonable purposes of the officers' offices and while in the performance of their assigned duties. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the authorities, responsibilities and liabilities of the officers shall be limited as provided for under this section.

Each peace officer appointed or designated by the owner of a category I nuclear facility is authorized to use deadly force under conditions of necessity, when all lesser means have failed or cannot reasonably be employed and when one (1) or more of the following circumstances exist:

Deadly force appears reasonably necessary to protect the peace officer, who reasonably believes the peace officer is in imminent danger of death or serious bodily injury;

Deadly force appears reasonably necessary to prevent the imminent infliction or threatened infliction of death or serious bodily harm or the sabotage of an occupied facility by explosives;

Deadly force appears reasonably necessary to prevent the theft, sabotage, or unauthorized control of a nuclear weapon or nuclear explosive device or special nuclear material from a category I nuclear facility; or

Deadly force reasonably appears to be necessary to apprehend or prevent the escape of a person reasonably believed to:

Have committed an offense of the nature specified in subdivision (i)(3)(A), (B) or (C); or

Be escaping by use of a weapon or explosive or who otherwise poses an imminent danger of death or serious bodily harm to peace officers or others unless apprehended without delay.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires, “category I nuclear facility” means a facility that possesses a formula quantity of strategic special nuclear material, as defined and licensed by the United States nuclear regulatory commission, and that must comply with the requirements of 10 CFR part 73.

Subsections (a)-(h) shall apply to air carriers holding an air carrier certificate issued under 14 CFR part 119 and operating under 14 CFR part 121, or to the corporate parent of such entities, either of which shall have the same rights, authority and limitations as TVA possesses with regard to the appointment of peace officers, known under this section as transportation security officers. The following shall apply to transportation security officers:

The air carrier or the parent of the entity employing and designating transportation security officers shall own or lease property, and employ persons within the state of Tennessee;

Only personnel of the air carrier, or its parent, who are designated as transportation security officers by such air carrier shall receive appointments;

Each transportation security officer appointed or designated by air carriers holding an air carrier certificate under 14 CFR part 119 and operating under 14 CFR part 121, or the corporate parent of such entities, shall possess all of the powers of a peace officer described in this section, including the power to make arrests for public offenses committed against employees or agents or against the property of the air carrier or its corporate parent and, while in pursuit of a person fleeing after committing such an offense, may pursue the person and make arrests. Additionally, the officers shall possess authority to carry weapons for the reasonable purposes of the officers' offices and while in the performance of the officers' assigned duties. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the authorities, responsibilities and liabilities of the officers shall be limited as provided for under this section;

The air carrier, or its parent, and any personnel employed by the carrier shall comply with all requirements of federal law pertaining to security operations associated with air carriers;

Transportation security officers appointed under this section must complete appropriate initial and recurrent law enforcement training substantially equivalent to the requirements of the Tennessee peace officer standards and training commission;

Any air carrier qualifying under the provisions of this subsection (j) shall, at the time of the first appointment of transportation security officers, notify the proprietors of the airports served by the air carrier of the appointment of the officers, and the air carrier shall comply with the security plans of each airport with respect to the carrying of arms by the officers; and

This subsection (j) shall not require an air carrier to designate any transportation security officers or otherwise staff law enforcement positions.

Acts 1989, ch. 76, §§ 1-9; 2001, ch. 25, § 1; 2002, ch. 849, § 10; 2007, ch. 14, § 1.

Cross-References. Arrest, title 40, ch. 7, part 1.

Uniform law on fresh pursuit, title 40, ch. 7, part 2.

38-3-121. Use of choke holds.

No law enforcement officer shall use a choke hold or other similar respiratory restraining maneuver, with or without the use of a police baton, on any suspect, defendant or other person unless other methods of restraint are ineffective. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the use of the lateral vascular maneuver.

Acts 1994, ch. 893, § 2.

Cross-References. Choke hold training, § 38-8-113.

38-3-122. Fingerprinting of arrestees pursuant to incarceration or bond.

It is the duty of every booking agency to take, or cause to be taken, a full set of fingerprints of each person arrested, whether by warrant or capias, for an offense that results in the person's incarceration in a jail facility or the person's posting of a bond to avoid incarceration; provided, that fingerprints are not required to be taken of an individual who is repeatedly arrested and incarcerated for a violation of § 39-17-310, the offense of public intoxication; provided, further, that the booking or arresting officer has verified that the individual's fingerprints are on file from a previous arrest; and provided, further, that fingerprints are not required to be taken of individuals whose fingerprints have previously been stored in the electronic fingerprint imaging files of the law enforcement agency booking the individual, if the arresting or booking officer has verified that the individual's fingerprints are on file through the use of a single digit imaging reader. If the fingerprints are maintained manually, the booking agency shall send a full set of properly completed fingerprints to the Tennessee bureau of investigation. If fingerprints are transmitted to the Tennessee bureau of investigation electronically, the booking agency shall maintain with the arrest report one (1) hard copy of the fingerprints along with an acknowledgement from the Tennessee bureau of investigation that a copy of the fingerprints has been received and accepted. Upon receipt of the fingerprints, the Tennessee bureau of investigation shall retain the fingerprints as provided in § 38-6-103, and shall send a set of the fingerprints to the federal bureau of investigation.

Regardless of whether fingerprints are found to be on file in a law enforcement agency, nothing in subdivision (a)(1) shall be construed as relieving the booking officer from:

Reproducing a copy of the fingerprints that are on file;

Updating the arrest data; and

Then forwarding a full set of fingerprints to the Tennessee bureau of investigation in compliance with this section.

A person who is issued a citation pursuant to § 40-7-118 or § 40-7-120 shall not, for purposes of this section, be considered to have been arrested and the agency issuing the citation shall not be required to take the fingerprints of such person.

The expense incurred by the Tennessee bureau of investigation by the provisions of §§ 8-4-115, 8-8-201(35), this section and § 38-8-111(g) requiring law enforcement officials to take the fingerprints of each person arrested and send them to the bureau shall be funded by either an appropriation in the general appropriations act or by a fifteen dollar ($15.00) increase in the amount of each handgun carry permit application fee; provided, that if there is such an appropriation in the general appropriations act, then the handgun carry permit application fee shall not be increased. Any funds derived from the fifteen dollar ($15.00) increase in the amount of each handgun carry permit application fee shall not revert to the general fund on June 30 of any year but shall remain available for expenditure for its intended purpose as stated within this section.

Acts 1997, ch. 502, §§ 3, 5; 1998, ch. 994, §§ 6, 8; 1999, ch. 338, § 1; 2000, ch. 711, § 1; 2008, ch. 701, §§ 7, 8.

38-3-123. Prohibition against requiring victims of sexual offenses to submit to polygraph.

No law enforcement officer shall require any victim of a sexual offense, as defined in § 40-39-202, or violent sexual offense, as defined in § 40-39-202, to submit to a polygraph examination or any other test designed to detect deception or verify the truth of statements through instrumentation or by means of a mechanical device, as a condition of the officer proceeding with the investigation of the offense.

A violation of this section shall subject the officer to appropriate departmental disciplinary action.

Acts 2006, ch. 638, § 1.

Cross-References. Polygraph examiners, title 62, ch. 27.

38-3-120. Peace officers for Tennessee valley authority.